test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-coggalm_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - cõõggâlm e-stem tuki: # Noun - full paradigm
     cõõggâlm+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: cõõggâlm
     cõõggâlm+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: cõõggâlm
     cõõggâlm+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: cõõggâlm
     cõõggâlm+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: cõglma
     cõõggâlm+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: cõglmest
     cõõggâlm+N+Sg+Com+Indef: cõglmin
     cõõggâlm+N+Ess+Indef: cõglmen
     cõõggâlm+N+Par+Indef: cõglmed
     cõõggâlm+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [cõõggâlmtaa, cõõggâlmtää]
     cõõggâlm+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: cõõggâlm
     cõõggâlm+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: cõglmi
     cõõggâlm+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: cõglmid
     cõõggâlm+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: cõglmid
     cõõggâlm+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: cõglmin
     cõõggâlm+N+Pl+Com+Indef: cõglmivuiʹm
     cõõggâlm+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [cõglmitaa, cõglmitää]
